Washington statutes.
RCW 18.56.030

Use of remote technology for corrective lens prescriptions.

A qualified provider may prepare a prescription for corrective lenses intended to correct an individual's refractive error by remote technology if:

(1) The prescribing qualified provider is held to the same standard of care applicable to qualified providers providing corrective lens prescriptions in traditional in-person clinical settings;

(2) A patient-practitioner relationship is clearly established by the qualified provider agreeing to provide a corrective lens prescription, whether or not there was an in-person encounter between the parties. The parameters of the patient-practitioner relationship for the use of remote technology must mirror those that would be expected for similar in-person encounters to provide corrective lens prescriptions;

(3) The remote technology is only offered to patients who meet appropriate screening criteria. A review of the patient's medical and ocular history that meets standard of care is required to determine who may or may not be safely treated with refraction without a concurrent comprehensive eye exam. Patients must also be informed that a refraction alone, whether utilizing remote technology or in person, does not substitute for a comprehensive eye exam;

(4) Continuity of care is maintained. Continuity of care requires but is not limited to:

(a) A qualified provider addressing an adverse event that occurs as a result of the prescription written by the qualified provider by:

(i) Being available to address the patient's vision or medical condition directly, either in-person or remotely, if it is possible to address the adverse event remotely;

(ii) Having an agreement with another qualified provider or licensed medical provider who is available to address the patient's vision or medical condition, either in-person or remotely; or

(iii) Referring the patient to a qualified provider or licensed medical provider who is capable of addressing the patient's condition;

(b) Retaining patient exam documentation for a minimum of ten years and retaining communication between the remote qualified provider who evaluated the patient and prescribed corrective lenses and any applicable providers as they normally would in an in-person setting; and

(5) When prescribing for contact lenses, the examination of the eyes is performed in accordance with the standard of care and standard of care for contact lenses. The components of the eye examination, if done remotely, must be to the same evaluation and standard of care the qualified provider would typically do in an in-person setting for the same condition. If the eye examination is performed by someone other than the prescribing qualified provider, the prescribing qualified provider must obtain written, faxed, or electronically communicated affirmative verification of the results of that eye examination from the provider who performed the examination. The absence of receipt of affirmative verification within any specified time period cannot be used as presumed affirmative verification.

[ 2020 c 241 s 4.]

NOTES:

Short title—2020 c 241: See note following RCW 18.56.010.